North Carolina, session 2025, SB426.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Chapter 53 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
Article to read:
"Article 26.
"Student Borrowers' Bill of Rights.
"§ 53-440. Short title.
This Article may be cited as the Student Borrowers' Bill of Rights.
"§ 53-441. Purpose.
This Article protects student loan borrowers and their families by providing that the
Commissioner of Banks shall license and regulate student loan servicers to ensure that student
loan borrowers and their families are treated fairly.
"§ 53-442. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Article:
(1) Borrower. – Any of the following:
a. An individual residing in this State who has received or agreed to pay
a student loan.
b. An individual who has received or agreed to pay a student loan or debt
to attend an institution located in this State.
c. A person that shares responsibility to repay a student loan with an
individual described in sub-subdivision a. or b. of this subdivision.
(2) Commissioner. – The Commissioner of Banks.
(3) Consumer reporting agency. – As defined in 15 U.S.C. § 1681a(f).
(4) Control. – The power, directly or indirectly, to direct the management or
policy of an entity, whether through ownership of securities, by contract, or
otherwise. The following persons are presumed to control an entity:
a. A director, general partner, or executive officer of the entity.
b. A person that directly or indirectly has ownership of or the power to
vote ten percent (10%) or more of a class of outstanding voting
securities of the entity.
c. In the case of a limited liability company, a managing member.
*S426-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
d. In the case of a partnership, a person that has the right to receive upon
dissolution, or has contributed, ten percent (10%) or more of the
capital of the partnership.
(5) Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry (NMLS). – The
licensing system developed and maintained by the Conference of State Bank
Supervisors and the American Association of Residential Mortgage
Regulators for the licensing of persons under this Article.
(6) Overpayment. – A payment on a student loan in excess of the amount due
from a borrower for a given period.
(7) Partial payment. – A payment on a student loan account that contains one or
more individual loans in an amount less than the amount necessary to satisfy
the outstanding payment due on all loans in the student loan account.
(8) Person. – An individual, partnership, limited liability company, limited
partnership, corporation, association, or other group engaged in joint business
activities however organized.
(9) Servicing. – Engaging in any of the following for compensation or gain:
a. Receiving or soliciting any scheduled periodic payment on a student
loan from a borrower or any notification that a borrower made a
scheduled periodic payment on a student loan and applying a payment
to the balance of the student loan.
b. During a period when no payment is required on a student loan,
maintaining account records for the student loan and communicating
with the borrower regarding the student loan on behalf of the owner of
the student loan.
c. Having the right to receive payments from a borrower when the loan
is delinquent or in default.
d. Interacting with a borrower to facilitate the activities described in
sub-subdivisions a. or b. of this subdivision, including helping a
borrower avoid default on a student loan.
(10) Student loan. – A loan or agreement that is extended to a borrower expressly
to finance postsecondary education expenses or other school-related expenses.
This term does not include the following:
a. Open-ended credit or any loan secured by real property.
b. Loans originated by entities exempted under G.S. 53-443(b), except
that loans are not excluded during periods in which they are serviced
by an entity not exempted under G.S. 53-443(b).
c. Loans serviced by entities exempted under G.S. 53-443(b).
(11) Student loan servicer. – Any person, regardless of location, responsible for
servicing a student loan.
(12) Written inquiry. – Any nonverbal communication in any format, whether
electronic or hard copy. A written inquiry does not include a communication
made to a consumer reporting agency involving a dispute under the Fair Debt
Collection Practices Act, 15 U.S.C. §§ 1692-1692p.
"§ 53-443. License requirement for student loan servicers.
(a) License Requirement. – No student loan servicer except those exempt under
subsection (b) of this section shall service a student loan unless the person has a student loan
servicer license as provided in this Article.
(b) Exemptions. – The following are exempt from all provisions of this Article:
(1) A bank, savings bank, credit union, or savings and loan association organized
under the laws of any state or the United States.
Page 2 Senate Bill 426-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) A wholly owned subsidiary of an entity described in subdivision (1) of this
subsection.
(3) The State or any political subdivision of the State.
(4) Institutions of higher education, as defined in G.S. 116-143.1.
(5) College Foundation, Inc.
(6) Eligible private postsecondary institutions, as defined in G.S. 116-280.
(7) Organizations, as described in 26 U.S.C. § 509(a)(1), (2), or (3), that support
the work of institutions of higher education and eligible private postsecondary
institutions exempted by this subsection.
"§ 53-444. License application.
(a) Application. – Applications under this Article shall be filed through the Nationwide
Multistate Licensing System and Registry (NMLS) in a form acceptable to the Commissioner.
To be considered complete, the application shall be verified by attestation of the applicant or a
designee of the applicant and shall include all of the following:
(1) The applicant's legal name, along with any assumed business name, principal
address, including street address and mailing address, contact information,
and social security number or taxpayer identification number.
(2) The applicant's form and place of organization, if applicable.
(3) A certificate of good standing from the state in which the applicant was
organized, if applicable.
(4) A certificate of authority from the North Carolina Secretary of State to
conduct business in this State, if required by Article 15 of Chapter 55 of the
General Statutes, or other evidence of the applicant's registration or
qualification to do business in this State.
(5) The qualifications and business history of the applicant and, if applicable, the
business history of any person controlling the applicant, including a
description of any injunction or administrative order by any state or federal
authority to which the person is or has been subject.
(6) The applicant's financial condition, including its credit history, business
history, and most recent audited annual financial statement or, if the applicant
is a wholly owned subsidiary, the most recent audited annual financial
statement of the applicant's parent entity. This statement shall include the
balance sheet, statement of income or loss, statement of changes in
shareholder equity, if applicable, and statement of changes in financial
position.
(7) A record of any criminal convictions for the applicant or, in the case of an
applicant that is an entity, each individual who has control of the applicant for
a 10-year period prior to the date of the application, including the applicant's
consent to a federal and State criminal background check and a set of the
applicant's fingerprints in a form acceptable to the Commissioner. In the case
of an applicant that is an entity, each individual who has control over the
applicant shall consent to a federal and State criminal background check and
shall submit a set of the individual's fingerprints.
(8) A current schedule of the ranges and categories of the fees it charges
borrowers for servicing student loans.
(9) Any additional information that the Commissioner deems relevant.
(b) Fees. – An applicant shall include a nonrefundable application fee of one thousand
five hundred dollars ($1,500) with the application. In addition, every applicant for initial
licensure shall pay the actual cost of obtaining a credit report and federal and State criminal
background checks and the processing fees required by the NMLS.
Senate Bill 426-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(c) Investigation. – On receipt of the application and fees, the Commissioner shall
investigate the applicant's financial condition and responsibility, financial and business
experience, and character and general fitness.
(d) Abandoned Application. – The Commissioner may deem an application abandoned if
the applicant fails to respond to a written request for information by the Commissioner within 30
days of the date of the request. The written request may be given to the applicant through the
NMLS or by other electronic means.
(e) Issuance of License. – The Commissioner shall issue a student loan servicer license
to an applicant if the Commissioner finds all of the following:
(1) The applicant has satisfied the requirements imposed by this Article.
(2) The applicant's business will be conducted honestly, fairly, and in a manner
commanding the confidence and trust of the community.
(3) The applicant has demonstrated net worth necessary to satisfy the
requirements of G.S. 53-445.
(4) The applicant has obtained a surety bond in conformance with G.S. 53-446.
(5) Persons controlling the applicant, as a group, have degrees of character,
competence, and experience that command the confidence and trust of the
community and justify the belief that the applicant will operate safely,
soundly, and in compliance with the law.
(6) The applicant meets other similar requirements determined by the
Commissioner.
(f) Automatic Issuance of License for Federal Student Loan Servicing Contractors. – A
person seeking to act within this State as a student loan servicer is exempt from the procedures
described in subsections (a) through (d) of this section upon a determination by the Commissioner
that the person is a party to a contract awarded by the United States Secretary of Education under
20 U.S.C. § 1087f. Any person seeking this exemption shall submit a written request for
verification of exemption to the Commissioner. The request shall be in a form acceptable to the
Commissioner and shall include a copy of any written agreement and related documentation that
is the basis for the exemption. The following provisions apply to the exemption:
(1) Actions by Commissioner. – With regard to a person deemed exempt under
this subsection, the Commissioner shall do both of the following:
a. Automatically issue a license upon payment of the fees required by
subsection (b) of this section.
b. Automatically issue a renewal license upon payment of the assessment
required by G.S. 53-448.
(2) Notice. – A person issued a license pursuant to this subsection shall provide
the Commissioner with written notice within seven days after notification of
the expiration, revocation, or termination of any contract awarded by the
United States Secretary of Education under 20 U.S.C. § 1087f. The person has
30 days after notification to satisfy all requirements established under
subsections (a) and (b) of this section in order to continue to act within this
State as a student loan servicer. At the expiration of the 30-day period, if the
person seeking to act within this State as a student loan servicer has not
satisfied the requirements of subsections (a) and (b) of this section, the
Commissioner shall summarily suspend any license granted to the person
under this section.
(3) Preservation of authorities. – With respect to student loan servicing not
conducted pursuant to a contract awarded by the United States Secretary of
Education under 20 U.S.C. § 1087f, nothing in this section prevents the
Commissioner from issuing, or filing a civil action for, an order to temporarily
Page 4 Senate Bill 426-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
or permanently enjoin a person from acting as a student loan servicer or from
violating this Article.
"§ 53-445. Minimum net worth.
(a) An applicant shall possess and a licensee shall maintain at all times a net worth of not
less than two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) calculated in accordance with generally
accepted accounting principles.
(b) The Commissioner may by order increase the amount of net worth required of an
applicant or licensee if the Commissioner determines additional net worth is necessary to ensure
safe and sound operation based on consideration of the following factors:
(1) The nature and volume of the projected or established business.
(2) The amount, nature, quality, and liquidity of assets.
(3) The amount and nature of liabilities.
(4) The history of operations and prospects for earning and retaining income.
(5) The quality of operations and management.
(6) The nature and quality of control persons.
(7) The history of compliance with State and federal law.
(8) Any other factors the Commissioner deems relevant.
"§ 53-446. Surety bond.
(a) Applicants shall be required to post a surety bond with the Commissioner at
application, and licensees shall maintain a surety bond in the amount of one hundred fifty
thousand dollars ($150,000). If a student loan servicer, however, has a servicing volume in this
State in a calendar year in excess of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) but less than fifty million
dollars ($50,000,000), then the student loan servicer's minimum bond amount shall be two
hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000), and, if a student loan servicer has a servicing volume
in this State in a calendar year of fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) or more, then the student
loan servicer's minimum bond shall be five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000).
(b) The surety bond shall be in a form satisfactory to the Commissioner and shall run to
the State for the benefit of any claimants against the licensee to secure the faithful performance
of the obligations of the licensee. The Commissioner has the discretion to require the applicant
to obtain additional insurance coverage to address related cybersecurity risks inherent in the
applicant's business model as it relates to student loan servicing to the extent those risks are not
within the scope of the surety bond.
(c) The aggregate liability of the surety in no event shall exceed the principal sum of the
bond. Claimants against the licensee may themselves bring suit directly on the surety bond, or
the Commissioner may bring suit on behalf of the claimants, either in one action or in successive
actions. Borrower claims shall be given priority in recovering from the bond. When an action is
commenced on a licensee's bond, the Commissioner may require the posting of a new bond; in
this case, the licensee shall post a replacement bond in the required amount within 30 days.
Immediately upon recovery upon any action on the bond, the licensee shall post a new bond.
(d) The surety bond shall remain in effect until cancellation, which may occur only after
90 days' written notice to the Commissioner. Cancellation does not affect any liability incurred
during that period.
(e) The surety bond shall remain in place for no less than five years after the licensee
ceases student loan servicing operations in this State. The Commissioner, however, may permit
the surety bond to be reduced or eliminated if the Commissioner determines that the reduction or
elimination will not harm borrowers or this State.
(f) The surety bond proceeds and any cash or other collateral posted as security by a
licensee is deemed to be held in trust for the benefit of any claimants against the licensee and for
the benefit of the State in the event of the licensee's bankruptcy.
"§ 53-447. License renewal, expiration, and cancellation; no assignability; acquisition of
licensee.
Senate Bill 426-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(a) Renewal. – A license under this Article shall be renewed annually. A licensee shall
apply to renew a license by submitting an application to the Commissioner through the NMLS
on or after July 1 of each year. The renewal applicant shall continue to meet the requirements for
initial licensure as provided in G.S. 53-444 but is not required to pay the fees described in
subsection (b) of that section.
(b) Expiration. – A license under this Article expires annually on September 30 unless it
is renewed under subsection (a) of this section.
(c) Reinstatement. – If a licensee has not renewed prior to the expiration date, then the
licensee shall pay two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00) as a nonrefundable late fee to reinstate the
license. In the event the licensee fails to obtain a reinstatement of the license prior to October 31,
the Commissioner shall require the licensee to comply with the requirements for initial licensure
as provided in G.S. 53-444, including the fees described in subsection (b) of that section.
(d) Cessation of Operations. – To cease student loan servicing operations in this State, a
licensee shall first obtain the approval of the Commissioner. To obtain this approval, the licensee
shall provide written notice to the Commissioner of the location of the licensee's records and the
name, address, and telephone number of an individual authorized to provide access to the records.
The licensee shall provide written notice at least 60 days prior to the cessation of operation.
If the Commissioner determines that the licensee's cessation of operations will not harm
borrowers or this State, the Commissioner may order the cancellation of the license. The
cancellation of a license under this subsection does not reduce or eliminate any civil or criminal
liability of a licensee arising from acts or omissions occurring before the cancellation.
(e) Assignability. – A license issued under this Article is not assignable.
(f) Acquisition of Licensee. – Control of a licensee shall not be acquired through a stock
purchase, merger, or other device without prior written consent of the Commissioner. The
Commissioner shall not give consent if the Commissioner finds that any of the grounds for denial,
revocation, or suspension as set forth under G.S. 53-455 apply to the acquiring person.
"§ 53-448. Assessments.
(a) Annual Assessments. – For purposes of meeting the cost of regulation under this
Article, each licensee shall pay to the Commissioner an annual assessment in the amount of one
dollar ($1.00) per borrower served by the licensee. The annual assessment shall be based on the
number of borrowers reported by the licensee pursuant to G.S. 53-449(b). The Commissioner
may collect the assessment annually or in periodic installments. All assessments for the prior
year shall be paid before a licensee may renew its license.
(b) Special Assessments. – If the Commissioner determines that the financial condition
or manner of operation of a licensee warrants further examination or an increased level of
supervision, the Commissioner may charge, and the licensee shall pay, a special assessment equal
to the reasonable cost of further examination or increased level of supervision. The
Commissioner's determination of this cost is, in the absence of manifest error, dispositive of the
issue of reasonableness.
"§ 53-449. Duties of licensee to the Commissioner.
(a) Notice of Material Event. –
(1) Within 20 days of a change or acquisition of control of a licensee, the licensee
shall provide notice of the event to the Commissioner through the NMLS in
writing and in a form prescribed by the Commissioner. The notice shall be
accompanied by any information, data, and records required by the
Commissioner.
(2) Within 20 days of the occurrence of any one of the following events, a licensee
shall file a written report with the Commissioner through the NMLS
describing the event and its expected impact on the licensee's activities in this
State:
a. The filing for bankruptcy or reorganization by the licensee.
Page 6 Senate Bill 426-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
b. The institution of revocation or suspension proceedings against the
licensee by any State or governmental agency.
c. Any felony indictment of the licensee or any control person related to
student loan servicing activities.
d. Any felony conviction of the licensee or any control person related to
student loan servicing activities.
(3) If the information contained in any document filed with the Commissioner or
the NMLS is or becomes inaccurate or incomplete in any material respect, the
licensee or applicant shall within 30 days file a correcting amendment to the
information contained in the document.
(b) Annual Report on Student Loans. – No later than 90 days after the end of the calendar
year, a licensee shall file an annual report in a form prescribed by the Commissioner through the
NMLS. The report shall include all of the following relating to student loans serviced by the
licensee on behalf of borrowers in this State:
(1) The number of borrowers, number of student loans, and total outstanding
balance.
(2) With respect to student loans enrolled in any type of income-driven repayment
plan, the number of borrowers, number of student loans, and total outstanding
balance.
(3) The types of student loans, such as federal, private, Federal Family Education
Loan (FFEL), Parent Plus, Perkins, and institutional loans, and the number of
student loans for each type.
(4) The number of student loans in default, along with a breakdown of the total
number of student loans 30 to 90 days delinquent, 91 to 180 days delinquent,
and 181 to 270 days delinquent.
(5) Any other information deemed relevant by the Commissioner.
"§ 53-450. Duties of student loan servicer to borrowers.
(a) A student loan servicer shall respond to a written inquiry from a borrower or the
representative of a borrower within 10 days of receipt of the request and, within 30 days after the
receipt of the request, shall provide information relating to the request and, if applicable, the
action the student loan servicer will take to correct the borrower's account or an explanation for
why the student loan servicer believes the account is correct.
(b) The 30-day period in subsection (a) of this section may be extended for not more than
15 days if, before the end of the 30-day period, the student loan servicer notifies the borrower or
the borrower's representative of the extension and the reason for the delay.
(c) Except when required by 15 U.S.C. § 1692e(8) to communicate that a debt is disputed,
a student loan servicer shall not furnish to a consumer reporting agency information regarding a
payment that is the subject of a written inquiry related to a dispute on a borrower's payment on a
student loan during the 60 days following receipt of the written inquiry. A student loan servicer,
however, may furnish to a consumer reporting agency information regarding the disputed
payment after this period of time, even if the borrower submits an additional written inquiry.
(d) Except as provided in federal law or required by a student loan agreement, a student
loan servicer shall inquire of a borrower how to apply an overpayment to a student loan. A
borrower's direction on how to apply an overpayment to a student loan stays in effect for any
future overpayments during the term of the loan until the borrower provides different directions.
(e) A student loan servicer shall apply partial payments in a manner that minimizes late
fees and negative credit reporting. Where loans on a borrower's student loan account have an
equal level of delinquency, a student loan servicer shall apply partial payments to satisfy as many
individual loan payments as possible on the borrower's account.
Senate Bill 426-First Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(f) In the event of the sale, assignment, or other transfer of the servicing of a student loan
that results in a change in the identity of the person to which a borrower is required to send
payments or direct any communication concerning the loan, the following provisions apply:
(1) The new student loan servicer shall honor all benefits originally represented
as available during repayment, including those for which the borrower has not
yet qualified.
(2) The old student loan servicer shall transfer all records of the borrower to the
new student loan servicer within 45 days of the sale, assignment, or transfer.
(3) The new student loan servicer shall provide notice to the borrower of the sale,
assignment, or transfer at least seven days before the first payment is due to
the new student loan servicer. The notice shall include the identity of the new
student loan servicer, the effective date of the sale, assignment, or transfer, the
date the old student loan servicer will no longer accept payments, and the
contact information for the new student loan servicer.
(g) Except as otherwise provided in federal law, federal student loan agreements, or a
contract between the federal government and a student loan servicer, a student loan servicer shall
properly evaluate a borrower for an income-based repayment program, public service loan
forgiveness program, or other repayment program before placing the borrower in forbearance or
default if one or more of these programs is available to the borrower.
"§ 53-451. Prohibited conduct.
In addition to the activities prohibited under other provisions of this Article, it is unlawful for
any student loan servicer to do any of the following:
(1) Directly or indirectly employ a scheme, device, or artifice to defraud or
mislead borrowers or the Commissioner.
(2) Engage in an unfair or deceptive trade practice toward any person or
misrepresent or omit any material information in connection with the
servicing of a student loan, including the amount, nature, or terms of any fee
or payment due or claimed to be due on a student loan, the terms and
conditions of the loan agreement, or the borrower's obligation under the
student loan.
(3) Obtain property by fraud or misrepresentation.
(4) Misapply payments to the outstanding balance of a student loan.
(5) Provide inaccurate information to a consumer reporting agency.
(6) Fail to report both the favorable and unfavorable payment history of a
borrower to a consumer reporting agency at least annually if the student loan
servicer regularly reports information to a consumer reporting agency.
(7) Refuse to communicate with an authorized representative of a borrower who
provides any written authorization signed by the borrower. The student loan
servicer, however, may adopt procedures reasonably related to verifying that
the representative is in fact authorized to act on behalf of the borrower. For
purposes of this subdivision, a borrower who has submitted a complaint to any
State agency is deemed to have authorized the student loan servicer to
communicate directly with the State agency about the borrower's student loan.
(8) Fail to respond to a communication from any State agency within 20 days or
within a shorter reasonable period of time if requested by the State agency.
(9) Fail to respond within 20 days to a complaint submitted to the student loan
servicer by the Commissioner or Student Loan Ombudsman. If necessary, the
student loan servicer may request additional time to respond to the complaint,
up to a maximum of 45 days, so long as the request is accompanied by an
explanation for why additional time is reasonable and necessary.
Page 8 Senate Bill 426-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(10) Make any false statement or omit any material fact in connection with
information or reports filed with a governmental agency or in connection with
an investigation or examination conducted by the Commissioner.
(11) Communicate with a borrower in any manner designed to harass or intimidate
the borrower.
(12) Violate State or federal privacy laws.
"§ 53-452. Commissioner's authority to investigate and examine.
(a) For purposes of carrying out this Article, the Commissioner may access any
documents or information, including all of the following:
(1) Criminal, civil, and administrative history information, including data
unrelated to a conviction.
(2) Personal history and experience information, including independent credit
reports obtained from a consumer reporting agency.
(3) Any other documents, information, or evidence the Commissioner deems
relevant to the inquiry, investigation, or examination regardless of the
location, possession, control, or custody of the documents or information.
(b) The Commissioner may investigate or examine any student loan servicer as often as
necessary to carry out the purposes of this Article. The Commissioner may interview borrowers,
as well as the student loan servicer's controlling persons, employees, independent contractors,
and agents. The Commissioner may order the attendance of and examine under oath all persons
whose testimony about the student loan servicing activity the Commissioner deems relevant. The
Commissioner may also order the student loan servicer to produce documents or information the
Commissioner deems relevant. Any investigation or examination that, in the opinion of the
Commissioner, requires extraordinary review, investigation, or examination is subject to the
actual costs of additional expenses and the hourly rate for the Office of the Commissioner of
Banks' staff's time, to be determined annually by the State Banking Commission.
(c) Upon request, each student loan servicer shall make available in a location that is
acceptable to the Commissioner the records relating to the operations of the student loan servicer.
No person shall knowingly withhold, remove, secrete, mutilate, or destroy any records or
information. The Commissioner may control access to the records by moving them to another
location or placing a person in exclusive charge of them where they are usually kept. During this
period of control, no person shall remove any records or information except pursuant to a court
order or with the consent of the Commissioner. Unless the Commissioner has a reason to believe
the records are at risk of being withheld, removed, secreted, mutilated, or destroyed, the student
loan servicer shall have access to them.
(d) Each student loan servicer shall make or compile reports as directed by the
Commissioner to carry out the purposes of this section, including any of the following:
(1) Accounting compilations.
(2) Information lists and data concerning student loan servicing activities in a
format prescribed by the Commissioner.
(3) Periodic reports, including any of the following:
a. Annual report questionnaires.
b. Any report required by the NMLS.
(e) To carry out the purposes of this section, the Commissioner may do any of the
following:
(1) Retain attorneys, accountants, or other professionals and specialists as
examiners, auditors, or investigators to assist with the investigation or
examination.
(2) Enter into agreements or relationships with other governmental agencies or
regulatory associations to improve efficiencies and reduce the regulatory
Senate Bill 426-First Edition Page 9

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
burden by sharing resources, standardized or uniform methods or procedures,
or documents or information obtained under this section.
(3) Use, hire, contract, or employ publicly or privately available analytical
systems, methods, or software.
(4) Accept and rely on investigation and examination reports made by other
governmental agencies.
(5) Accept an audit report made by an independent certified public accountant
and incorporate the audit report in the report of the investigation or
examination or other writing of the Commissioner.
(f) The Commissioner may take any action described in G.S. 53-455 or G.S. 53-456,
including summary suspension of the license, if a student loan servicer fails within 20 days, or a
lesser time if requested for good cause, to do any of the following:
(1) Respond to inquiries from the Commissioner regarding any complaint filed
against the student loan servicer that appears to involve a violation of this
Article or any rule adopted or order issued under this Article.
(2) Respond to and cooperate fully with notices from the Commissioner relating
to the scheduling and conducting of an investigation or examination.
(3) Consent to a criminal history record check. The refusal constitutes grounds
for the Commissioner to deny licensure to the applicant as well as any person
controlled by the applicant.
"§ 53-453. Confidentiality.
(a) All information obtained by the Commissioner under this Article is subject to
confidential treatment as provided in G.S. 53C-2-7.
(b) Notwithstanding any State law to the contrary, the Commissioner shall report
enforcement actions under this Article and any other relevant information to the NMLS.
(c) The Commissioner may enter into written agreements with other governmental
agencies, the Conference of State Bank Supervisors, or other associations representing
governmental agencies and may share otherwise confidential information pursuant to these
agreements.
(d) The requirements of G.S. 53C-2-7 regarding the privacy or confidentiality of any
information provided under subsections (b) and (c) of this section, and any privilege arising under
any other federal or State law with respect to the information, continues to apply to the
information after it has been disclosed to an entity described in subsection (b) or (c) of this
section. Information held by the entity is not subject to disclosure under any State law governing
the disclosure to the public of information held by an officer or agency of the State. The entities
described in subsection (b) or (c) of this section may share information with all State and federal
regulatory officials with student loan industry oversight authority without the loss of privilege or
the loss of confidentiality protections provided by State and federal law.
(e) Nothing in this section prohibits the Commissioner from releasing to the public a list
of persons licensed under this Article or aggregated financial data on these licensees.
"§ 53-454. Regulatory authority.
(a) Unless otherwise provided, all actions, hearings, and procedures under this Article
are governed by Article 3A of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes.
(b) Upon the issuance of any summary order permitted under this Article, including
summary suspensions and cease and desist orders, the Commissioner shall promptly notify the
licensee that the order has been entered and the reasons for the order. Within 20 days of receiving
notice of the order, the licensee may request in writing a hearing before the Commissioner. The
Commissioner shall schedule a hearing within 15 days of receiving the request. If the licensee
does not request a hearing, the order remains in effect unless it is modified or vacated by the
Commissioner.
"§ 53-455. Disciplinary action.
Page 10 Senate Bill 426-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(a) The Commissioner may, by order, deny, suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew a license
under this Article or may restrict the manner in which a licensee or a controlling person of a
licensee engages in student loan servicing, if the Commissioner finds both of the following:
(1) The order is in the public interest.
(2) The licensee or a controlling person of the licensee has done or is subject to
any of the following:
a. Submitted an application for licensure, report, or other document to
the Commissioner that, as of its effective date or later, contained a
statement that, in light of the circumstances under which it was made,
is false or misleading with respect to a material fact.
b. Violated any provision of this Article or rule adopted or order issued
under this Article.
c. Is permanently or temporarily enjoined by a court from engaging in
student loan servicing.
d. Is the subject of an order entered within the past five years by any
governmental agency with jurisdiction over the student loan servicing
industry.
(b) If the Commissioner has reason to believe that a licensee has violated any provision
of this Article or rule adopted or order issued under this Article, the Commissioner may take any
of the following actions:
(1) Summarily order the licensee to cease and desist from any harmful activities
or violations of this Article.
(2) Summarily suspend the license of the licensee.
This subsection supplements the Commissioner's authority under G.S. 150B-3(c).
(c) If a licensee is accused of any act or omission that would subject the licensee to
disciplinary action under this section, the licensee, with the approval of the Commissioner, may
surrender the license and all of the rights and privileges pertaining to it. A person that surrenders
a license is not eligible for licensure under this Article during any period specified by the
Commissioner.
"§ 53-456. Civil penalty; restitution; disgorgement; authority to prohibit certain conduct.
(a) Civil Penalty. – The Commissioner may assess a civil penalty against a student loan
servicer not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for each violation of this Article,
rules adopted under this Article, or order of the Commissioner issued under this Article. The
clear proceeds of civil penalties imposed pursuant to this section shall be remitted to the Civil
Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with G.S. 115C-457.2.
(b) Restitution. – If a student loan servicer violates this Article or rule adopted or order
issued under this Article, the Commissioner may order the student loan servicer to pay restitution
to a borrower injured by the violation.
(c) Disgorgement. – The Commissioner may require a student loan servicer to disgorge
and pay to the borrower or other person any amount received by the student loan servicer
collected in violation of Chapter 24 of the General Statutes.
(d) Authority to Prohibit. – The Commissioner may prohibit a student loan servicer from
engaging in acts or practices in connection with student loan servicing that the Commissioner
finds to be unfair, deceptive, designed to evade the laws of this State, or not in the best interest
of the borrowing public.
"§ 53-457. Civil remedy.
(a) A borrower may bring a civil action for damages against a student loan servicer for
an injury caused by the student loan servicer's violation of this Article or rule adopted or order
issued under this Article. If the violation occurs in connection with the sale, assignment, or other
transfer of the servicing between two student loan servicers, the student loan servicers remain
jointly and severally liable for the injury.
Senate Bill 426-First Edition Page 11

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(b) A violation of this Article or rule adopted or order issued under this Article is an
unfair or deceptive trade practice for purposes of Chapter 75 of the General Statutes. Nothing in
this Article limits any claim otherwise arising under G.S. 75-1.1.
"§ 53-458. Service of process.
(a) A licensee under this Article is deemed to have done both of the following:
(1) Consented to the jurisdiction of the courts of this State for an action arising
under this Article.
(2) Appointed the Secretary of State as the licensee's agent for the purpose of
accepting service of process in an action arising under this Article.
(b) The Commissioner is deemed to have complied with the requirement of law
concerning service of process upon mailing by certified mail notice to a licensee, postage prepaid
and addressed to the last known address on file with the Commissioner.
"§ 53-459. Rules; appeal by aggrieved person.
(a) The Commissioner may adopt any rule that the Commissioner deems necessary to
carry out the provisions of this Article.
(b) Pursuant to G.S. 53C-2-6(b), any person aggrieved by any rule adopted or order
issued by the Commissioner may appeal to the State Banking Commission for review upon
providing a written notice of appeal within 20 days after the rule was adopted or order was issued.
The notice of appeal shall specifically state the grounds for appeal and, in the case of an appeal
from a contested case proceeding before the Commissioner, shall set forth in numbered order the
assignments of error for review by the State Banking Commission. Failure to specify the
assignments of error or failure to comply with the briefing schedule provided by the State
Banking Commission constitutes grounds to dismiss the appeal. Any party aggrieved by a
decision of the State Banking Commission may petition for judicial review pursuant to
G.S. 53C-2-6(b).
"§ 53-460. Commissioner's participation in nationwide registry.
A student loan servicer shall be licensed through the NMLS. In order to carry out this
requirement, the Commissioner may participate in the NMLS. G.S. 53-244.119 applies to this
section."
SECTION 1.(b) This section becomes effective June 1, 2026.
SECTION 2.(a) Article 26 of Chapter 53 of the General Statutes, as enacted by this
act, is amended by adding the following new sections to read:
"§ 53-461. Student Loan Ombudsman.
The Commissioner of Banks shall designate a Student Loan Ombudsman to carry out the
duties and activities set forth in this Article. The Ombudsman shall provide timely assistance to
any borrower of a student loan in this State.
"§ 53-462. Duties of the Ombudsman; education course; reports.
(a) The Commissioner of Banks shall ensure that the Ombudsman does all of the
following:
(1) Receives, reviews, and responds to any complaint from a student loan
borrower.
(2) Provides copies of complaints to the Attorney General, subject to
G.S. 53C-2-7.
(3) Compiles and analyzes data on student loan borrower complaints.
(4) Monitors and analyzes the development and implementation of federal, State,
and local laws and policies relating to student loan borrowers and recommends
any necessary changes to these laws and policies.
(5) Disseminates information concerning the Ombudsman's duties and the
regulatory duties of the Commissioner of Banks to institutions of higher
education, student loan servicers, and any other appropriate persons.
(6) Takes any other action necessary to fulfill the duties set forth in this section.
Page 12 Senate Bill 426-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(b) No later than July 1, 2027, the Office of the Commissioner of Banks, in coordination
with the State Education Assistance Authority, shall ensure that the Ombudsman establishes and
maintains a student loan borrower education course that includes educational presentations and
materials regarding student loans. The program shall include key loan terms, documentation
requirements, monthly payment obligations, income-based repayment options, the availability of
State and federal loan forgiveness programs, and disclosure requirements.
(c) No later than 12 months following the date of appointment of the Ombudsman and
annually thereafter, the Ombudsman shall submit a report to the General Assembly regarding all
of the following:
(1) The implementation of this section, including data collected and analyzed.
(2) The overall effectiveness of the Ombudsman position.
(3) The efficacy of the student loan borrower education course in making student
borrowers aware of their rights and responsibilities and the resources available
to them."
SECTION 2.(b) This section becomes effective January 1, 2027.
SECTION 3. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or
circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this
act that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application and, to this end, the
provisions of this act are severable.
SECTION 4. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Senate Bill 426-First Edition Page 13